Maryland, session 2026, HB1513.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That, as used herein, the term “County” means the body politic and corporate of the State
of Maryland known as the County Commissioners of Calvert County, and the term
“construction, improvement, or development of public facilities” means the acquisition,
alteration, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, equipping, expansion, extension,
improvement, rehabilitation, renovation, upgrading, and repair of public buildings, roads,
and facilities, including but not limited to Calvert Pines Senior Center Renovations, and
existing storm drainage systems around the County, and issuance costs together with the
costs of acquiring land or interests in land as well as any related architectural, financial,
legal, planning, or engineering services.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the County is hereby
authorized to finance any part or all of the costs of the public facilities described in Section
1 of this Act, and to borrow money and incur indebtedness for that purpose, at one time or
from time to time, in an amount not exceeding, in the aggregate, $80,957,080 and to
evidence such borrowing by the issuance and sale upon its full faith and credit of general
obligation bonds in like par amount, which may be issued at one time or from time to time,
in one or more groups or series, as the County may determine.
– 1 –

Ch. 339 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the bonds shall be issued in
accordance with a resolution of the County, which shall describe generally the construction,
improvement, or development of public facilities for which the proceeds of the bond sale are
intended and the amount needed for those purposes. The County shall have and is hereby
granted full and complete authority and discretion in the resolution to fix and determine
with respect to the bonds of any issue: the designation, date of issue, denomination or
denominations, form or forms, and tenor of the bonds which, without limitation, may be
issued in registered form within the meaning of § 19–204 of the Local Government Article
of the Annotated Code of Maryland, as amended; the rate or rates of interest payable
thereon, or the method of determining the same, which may include a variable rate; the
date or dates and amount or amounts of maturity, which need not be in equal par amounts
or in consecutive annual installments, provided only that no bond of any issue shall mature
later than 30 years from the date of its issue; the manner of selling the bonds, which may
be at either public or private sale, for such price or prices as may be determined to be for
the best interests of Calvert County; the manner of executing and sealing the bonds, which
may be by facsimile; the terms and conditions, if any, under which bonds may be tendered
for payment or purchase prior to their stated maturity; the terms or conditions, if any,
under which bonds may or shall be redeemed prior to their stated maturity; the place or
places of payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds, which may be at any
bank or trust company within or without the State of Maryland; covenants relating to
compliance with applicable requirements of federal income tax law, including (without
limitation) covenants regarding the payment of rebate or penalties in lieu of rebate;
covenants relating to compliance with applicable requirements of federal or state securities
laws; and generally all matters incident to the terms, conditions, issuance, sale, and
delivery thereof.
The bonds may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the County, at
such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the County
prior to the issuance of the bonds, either in the resolution or in a bond order pursuant to
the bond resolution. The bonds may be issued in registered form and provision may be made
for the registration of the principal only. In case any officer whose signature appears on
any bond ceases to be such officer before the delivery thereof, such signature shall
nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes as if he had remained in office until
such delivery. The bonds and the issuance and sale thereof shall be exempt from the
provisions of §§ 19–205 and 19–206 of the Local Government Article of the Annotated Code
of Maryland, as amended.
The County may enter into agreements with agents, banks, fiduciaries, insurers, or
others for the purpose of enhancing the marketability of any security for the bonds and for
the purpose of securing any tender option that may be granted to holders of the bonds, all
as may be determined and presented in the aforesaid resolution, which may (but need not)
state as security for the performance by the County of any monetary obligations under such
agreements the same security given by the County to bondholders for the performance by
the County of its monetary obligations under the bonds.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 339
If the County determines in the resolution to offer any of the bonds by solicitation of
competitive bids at public sale, the resolution shall fix the terms and conditions of the public
sale and shall adopt a form of notice of sale, which shall outline the terms and conditions,
and a form of advertisement, which shall be published in one or more daily or weekly
newspapers having a general circulation in the County and which may also be published in
one or more journals having a circulation primarily among banks and investment bankers.
At least one publication of the advertisement shall be made not less than 10 days before
the sale of the bonds.
Upon delivery of any bonds to the purchaser or purchasers, payment therefor shall
be made to the Treasurer of Calvert County or such other official of Calvert County as may
be designated to receive such payment in a resolution passed by the County before such
delivery.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the net proceeds of the sale
of bonds shall be used and applied exclusively and solely for the acquisition, construction,
improvement, or development of public facilities for which the bonds are sold. If the
amounts borrowed shall prove inadequate to finance the projects described in the
resolution, the County may issue additional bonds with the limitations hereof for the
purpose of evidencing the borrowing of additional funds for such financing, provided the
resolution authorizing the sale of additional bonds shall so recite, but if the net proceeds of
the sale of any issue of bonds exceed the amount needed to finance the projects described
in the resolution, the excess funds so borrowed and not expended shall be applied to the
payment of the next principal maturity of the bonds or to the redemption of any part of the
bonds which have been made redeemable or to the purchase and cancellation of bonds,
unless the County shall adopt a resolution allocating the excess funds to the acquisition,
construction, improvement, or development of other public facilities, as defined and within
the limits set forth in this Act.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the bonds hereby authorized
shall constitute, and they shall so recite, an irrevocable pledge of the full faith and credit
and unlimited taxing power of the County to the payment of the maturing principal of and
interest on the bonds as and when they become payable. In each and every fiscal year that
any of the bonds are outstanding, the County shall levy or cause to be levied ad valorem
taxes upon all the assessable property within the corporate limits of the County in rate and
amount sufficient to provide for or assure the payment, when due, of the principal of and
interest on all the bonds maturing in each such fiscal year and, in the event the proceeds
from the taxes so levied in any such fiscal year shall prove inadequate for such payment,
additional taxes shall be levied in the succeeding fiscal year to make up any such deficiency.
The County may apply to the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds issued
hereunder any funds received by it from the State of Maryland, the United States of
America, any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any other source, if such funds are
granted for the purpose of assisting the County in financing the acquisition, construction,
improvement, or development of the public facilities defined in this Act and, to the extent
of any such funds received or receivable in any fiscal year, the taxes that are required to be
levied may be reduced accordingly.
– 3 –

Ch. 339 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the County is further
authorized and empowered, at any time and from time to time, to issue its bonds in the
manner hereinabove described for the purpose of refunding, by payment at maturity or
upon purchase or redemption, any bonds issued hereunder. The validity of any such
refunding bonds shall in no way be dependent upon or related to the validity or invalidity
of the obligations so refunded. The powers herein granted with respect to the issuance of
bonds shall be applicable to the issuance of refunding bonds. Such refunding bonds may be
issued by the County in such an amount as shall be necessary for the purpose of providing
it with funds to pay any of its outstanding bonds issued hereunder at maturity, for the
purpose of providing it with funds to purchase in the open market any of its outstanding
bonds issued hereunder, prior to the maturity thereof, or for the purpose of providing it
with funds for the redemption prior to maturity of any outstanding bonds issued hereunder
which are, by their terms, redeemable, for the purpose of providing it with funds to pay
interest on any outstanding bonds issued hereunder prior to their payment at maturity of
purchase or redemption in advance of maturity, or for the purpose of providing it with funds
to pay any redemption or purchase premium in connection with the refunding of any of its
outstanding bonds issued hereunder. The proceeds of the sale of any such refunding bonds
shall be segregated and set apart by the County as a separate trust fund to be used solely
for the purpose of paying the purchase or redemption prices of the bonds to be refunded.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the County may, prior to the
preparation of definitive bonds, issue interim certificates or temporary bonds, exchangeable
for definitive bonds when such bonds have been executed and are available for such
delivery, provided, however, that any such interim certificates or temporary bonds shall be
issued in all respects subject to the restrictions and requirements set forth in this Act. The
County may, by appropriate resolution, provide for the replacement of any bonds issued
hereunder which shall have become mutilated or lost or destroyed upon such conditions
and after receiving such indemnity as the County may require.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That any and all obligations issued
pursuant to the authority of this Act, their transfer, the interest payable thereon, and any
income derived therefrom in the hands of the holders thereof from time to time (including
any profit made in the sale thereof) shall be and are hereby declared to be at all times
exempt from State, county, municipal, or other taxation of every kind and nature
whatsoever within the State of Maryland. Nothing in this Act shall prevent the County
from authorizing the issuance and sale of bonds the interest on which is not excludable
from gross income for federal income tax purposes.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the authority to borrow
money and issue bonds conferred on the County by this Act shall be deemed to provide an
additional and alternative authority for borrowing money and shall be regarded as
supplemental and additional to powers conferred upon the County by other laws and shall
not be regarded as in derogation of any power now existing; and all Acts of the General
Assembly of Maryland heretofore passed authorizing the County to borrow money are
hereby continued to the extent that the powers contained in such Acts have not been
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 339
exercised, and nothing contained in this Act may be construed to impair, in any way, the
validity of any bonds that may have been issued by the County under the authority of any
said Acts, and the validity of the bonds is hereby ratified, confirmed, and approved. This
Act, being necessary for the welfare of the inhabitants of Calvert County, shall be liberally
construed to effect the purposes hereof. All Acts and parts of Acts inconsistent with the
provisions of this Act are hereby repealed to the extent of such inconsistency.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
June 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 5 –